Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 1. In General

§ 40-12-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Consumer Protection Act.”

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-102.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

§ 40-12-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, trust, partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association or any other legal entity;

“Consumer transactions” means the advertising, offering for sale, sale or distribution of any merchandise to an individual for purposes that are primarily personal, family or household;

“Documentary material” means the original or a copy of any book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, map, chart, photograph, mechanical transcription, other tangible document or recording, reproductions of information stored magnetically, file layout, code conversion tables or computer programs to convert file to readable printout, wherever situated;

“Examination” of documentary material includes the inspection, study or copying of any such material, and the taking of testimony under oath or acknowledgement with respect to any such documentary material or copy thereof;

“Advertisement” includes the attempt by publication, dissemination, solicitation or circulation, whether oral, visual, written or otherwise, and whether in person, by telephone or by any other means to induce directly or indirectly any person to enter into any obligation or to acquire any title or interest in any merchandise;

“Merchandise” includes any service or any property, tangible or intangible, real, personal or mixed, or any other object, ware, good, commodity, or article of value wherever situated;

“Enforcing authority” means the attorney general of Wyoming;

“Cure” as applied to an unlawful deceptive trade practice as defined in W.S.

40-12-105

means either:

To offer in writing to adjust or modify the consumer transaction to which the unlawful deceptive trade practice relates to conform to the reasonable expectations of the consumer generated by such unlawful deceptive trade practice and to perform such offer if accepted by the consumer; or

To offer in writing to rescind such consumer transaction and to perform such offer if accepted by the consumer.

“Uncured unlawful deceptive trade practice” means an unlawful deceptive trade practice as defined in W.S.

40-12-105

:

With respect to which a consumer who has been damaged by the unlawful deceptive trade practice has given notice to the alleged violator pursuant to W.S.

40-12-109

; and

Either:

No offer to cure has been made to such consumer within fifteen (15) days after such notice; or

The unlawful deceptive trade practice has not been cured as to such consumer within a reasonable time after his acceptance of the offer to cure.

“This act” means W.S.

40-12-101

through

40-12-114

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-103; Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Notice. —

No notice was provided to the insurance agent of an alleged deceptive trade practice; had the insured read the policy, however, he could have notified the agent prior to the accident that the policy did not provide underinsured motorist coverage, thereby providing the opportunity for negotiations for the addition of such coverage, and the insured had no valid cause of action for an uncured deceptive trade practice under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act.
Broderick v. Dairyland INS. Co., 2012 WY 22, 270 P.3d 684,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 16, 2012).

§ 40-12-103.
Unsolicited merchandise.

Unless otherwise agreed, when unsolicited merchandise is delivered to a person, he has a right to refuse such merchandise and is not obligated to return such merchandise to the sender. Such unsolicited merchandise is deemed an unconditional gift to the recipient, who may use it in any manner without any obligation to the sender. This section does not apply if there is evidence that the merchandise has been misdelivered, or if the delivered merchandise is offered as a good faith substitution for merchandise previously solicited by the recipient.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-104.

§ 40-12-104.
Home solicitation sales.

For purposes of this section, “home solicitation sale” means the sale or lease of merchandise, other than farm equipment, for cash when the cash sales price, whether under a single sale or multiple sales, exceeds twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and in which the seller or a person acting for him engages in a personal solicitation of the sale at the residence of the buyer and the buyer’s agreement or offer to purchase is there given to the seller or a person acting for him. A personal solicitation of a sale at the residence of the buyer includes contact with the buyer in person or by telephone. “Home solicitation sale” does not include:

A sale made pursuant to a preexisting revolving charge account;

A sale made subsequent to a personal contact or a telephone contact at the residence of the buyer but pursuant to negotiations between the parties at a business establishment at a fixed location where goods or services are offered or exhibited for sale;

A sale made pursuant to a telephone solicitation when the seller offers a full refund and right of cancellation for at least ten (10) days after receipt of the merchandise and the right of refund and cancellation is communicated during the initial telephone solicitation and is conspicuously displayed with the merchandise; or

A sale in which a consumer acquires use of property under a rental-purchase agreement as defined in W.S. 40-19-102(a)(xi), with an initial period of one (1) week or less, by placing a telephone call to a merchant and by requesting that specific property be delivered to the consumer’s residence or such other place as the consumer directs and such rental-purchase agreement is consummated at the consumer’s residence.

Except as hereinafter provided, in addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the buyer has the right to cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase which complies with this part. Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address stated in the agreement or offer to purchase. Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is given when it is deposited in a mailbox properly addressed and postage prepaid. Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the home solicitation sale.

The buyer may not cancel a home solicitation sale if the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay because of an emergency and:

The seller in good faith makes a substantial beginning of performance of the contract before the buyer gives notice of cancellation; and

In the case of goods, the goods cannot be returned to the seller in substantially as good condition as when received by the buyer.

The period within which cancellation may occur pursuant to this section shall not commence until the buyer is furnished a copy of the completed, approved and accepted contract, is given the name and address to which the notice of cancellation should be sent and is provided with a written statement of his right of cancellation. The statement of the buyer’s right of cancellation shall comply with W.S. 40-14-253(b).

Except as hereinafter provided, within ten (10) days after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled:

The seller must tender to the buyer any payments made by the buyer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness;

If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods must be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller, and if the seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this subsection, the buyer may elect to recover an amount equal to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement;

The seller may retain as a cancellation fee five percent (5%) of the cash price but not exceeding the amount of the cash down payment. If the seller fails to comply with an obligation imposed by this section, or if the buyer voids the sale on any ground independent of his right to cancel or revokes his offer to purchase, the seller is not entitled to retain a cancellation fee;

Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by this subsection, the buyer may retain possession of goods delivered to him by the seller and has a lien on the goods in his possession or control for any recovery to which he is entitled.

Except as provided under subsection (e) of this section, within a reasonable time after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled or an offer to purchase revoked, the buyer upon demand must tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale but he is not obligated to tender at any place other than his residence. If the seller fails to demand possession of the goods within thirty (30) days after cancellation or revocation, the goods become the property of the buyer without obligation to pay for them.

The buyer has a duty to take reasonable care of the goods in his possession before cancellation or revocation and for thirty (30) days thereafter, during which time the goods are otherwise at the seller’s risk.

If the seller has performed any services pursuant to a home solicitation sale prior to its cancellation, the seller is entitled to no compensation except the cancellation fee provided in this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-105; Laws 1987, ch. 168, § 1; 1996, ch. 79, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statute or law pertaining to telephone solicitation, 44 ALR5th 619.

§ 40-12-105.
Unlawful practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice unlawful under this act when, in the course of his business and in connection with a consumer transaction, he knowingly:

Represents that merchandise has a source, origin, sponsorship, approval, accessories or uses it does not have;

Represents that he has a sponsorship, approval or affiliation he does not have;

Represents that merchandise is of a particular standard, grade, style or model, if it is not;

Represents that merchandise is available to the consumer for a reason that does not exist;

Represents that merchandise has been supplied in accordance with a previous representation, if it has not; except that this subsection does not apply to merchandise supplied to the recipient by mistake or merchandise of equal or greater value supplied as a reasonably equivalent substitute for unavailable merchandise previously ordered by the recipient;

Represents that replacement or repair is needed, if it is not;

Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the price of merchandise or the reason for, existence of, or amounts of a price reduction;

Represents that a consumer transaction involves a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, particular warranty terms, or other rights, remedies or obligations if the representation is false;

Represents that the consumer will receive a rebate, discount or other benefit as an inducement for entering into a consumer transaction in return for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer transactions, if receipt of the benefit is contingent upon an event occurring after the consumer enters into the transaction;

Advertises merchandise with intent not to sell it as advertised;

Advertises merchandise with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses the limitation;

Represents that merchandise is original or new if he knows that it is deteriorated, damaged, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand. For purposes of this subsection, the terms “original” or “new” include merchandise previously sold but returned within a reasonable time by the consumer for full credit if such merchandise is not damaged or deteriorated;

Advertises under the guise of obtaining sales personnel when in fact the purpose of the advertisement is to sell merchandise to the sales personnel applicants;

Employs “bait and switch” advertising which consists of an offer to sell merchandise which the seller does not intend to sell, which advertising is accompanied by one (1) or more of the following practices:

Refusal to show the merchandise advertised;

False disparagement in any respect of the advertised merchandise or the terms of sale;

Requiring undisclosed tie-in sales or other undisclosed conditions to be met prior to selling the advertised merchandise;

Knowingly showing or demonstrating defective merchandise which is unusable or practicable for the purpose set forth in the advertisement;

Accepting a deposit for the merchandise and subsequently charging the buyer for a higher priced item without his consent; or

Willful failure to either make deliveries of the merchandise or to make a refund therefor.

Engages in unfair or deceptive acts or practices;

Violates W.S.

40-12-601

;

Willfully fails to comply with the duties imposed by W.S.

34-29-106

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-106; Laws 1987, ch. 168, § 1; 2014 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 170, § 3, effective February 28, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to warranties generally, see §§ 34.1-2-312 through 34.1-2-318.

As to remedies under the Uniform Commercial Code, see § 34.1-2-701 et seq.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 170 § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(xvi).

The 2019 amendment,

added (a)(xvii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Video sales

may be covered under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act. However, a plaintiff must suggest in his pleadings that the act is applicable to the case. Osborn v. Emporium Videos, 870 P.2d 382,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1994).

Subpoena. —

Probable cause supported an investigative subpoena because the Consumer Protection Unit of the Wyoming Office of Attorney General had probable cause to believe that a limited liability company (LLC) had engaged in or was engaging in unfair or deceptive acts or practices; the Attorney General relied on several complaints to support its reasonable belief that the LLC lured consumers into a relationship with the promise of services that were not delivered. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

Quoted

in

Kure v. Chevrolet Motor Div., 581 P.2d 603,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Osborn v. Emporium Videos, 848 P.2d 237,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Understanding the New Tort of First Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: McCullough v. Golden Rule Insurance Company,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances prohibiting or restricting distribution of commercial advertising to private residences — modern cases, 12 ALR4th 851.

Liability of repairer for unauthorized, unnecessary, or fraudulent repairs of motor vehicle, 23 ALR4th 274.

Landlord's fraud, deceptive trade practices and the like, in connection with mobile home owner's lease or rental of landsite, 39 ALR4th 859.

What constitutes “fraudulent” or “unconscionable” agreement or conduct within the meaning of state consumer credit protection act, 42 ALR4th 293.

Actionable nature of advertising impugning quality or worth of merchandise or products, 42 ALR4th 318.

What goods or property are “used,” “secondhand” or the like, for purposes of state consumer laws prohibiting claims that such items are new, 59 ALR4th 1192.

World wide web domain as violating state trademark protection statute or state unfair trade practices act, 96 ALR5th 1.

Availability of permanent injunction under § 13(b) of Federal Trade Commission Act (15 USC § 53(b)), 70 ALR Fed 716.

§ 40-12-106.
Restraining unlawful practices.

Whenever the enforcing authority has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in any practice which is unlawful under W.S.

40-12-104

or

40-12-105

, and that proceedings would be in the public interest, he may bring an action in the name of this state against such person to restrain by temporary restraining order or preliminary or permanent injunction the use of such practice. The action may be brought in the district court of the county in which the person resides or has his principal place of business or in the district court of Laramie county, Wyoming. The district court may issue temporary restraining orders, including ex parte temporary restraining orders, or preliminary or permanent injunctions, in accordance with the principles of equity, to restrain and prevent violations of this act. The court may make such additional orders or judgments as are necessary to compensate identifiable persons for actual damages or restoration of money or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means or any act or practice restrained.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-107; Laws 1987, ch. 168, § 1; 2020 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to service, see Rules 4 and 5, W.R.C.P.

As to injunctions and notice, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, deleted “upon the giving of appropriate notice to that person. The notice must state generally the relief sought and must be served in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Before commencing any action, the enforcing authority shall give the person against whom proceedings are contemplated a reasonable opportunity to show why proceedings should not be instituted” at the end of the first sentence; added “including ex parte temporary restraining orders,” in the third sentence; and deleted the last sentence which read: “The remedies provided by this section, W.S.

40-12-108

and

40-12-111

shall be the exclusive remedies for violations of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Notice. —

No notice was provided to the insurance agent of an alleged deceptive trade practice; had the insured read the policy, however, he could have notified the agent prior to the accident that the policy did not provide underinsured motorist coverage, thereby providing the opportunity for negotiations for the addition of such coverage, and the insured had no valid cause of action for an uncured deceptive trade practice under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act.
Broderick v. Dairyland INS. Co., 2012 WY 22, 270 P.3d 684,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 16, 2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

World wide web domain as violating state trademark protection statute or state unfair trade practices act, 96 ALR5th 1.

Availability of permanent injunction under § 13(b) of Federal Trade Commission Act (15 USC § 53(b)), 70 ALR Fed 716.

§ 40-12-107.
Assurances of voluntary compliance.

The enforcing authority may accept written assurance of voluntary compliance with respect to any practice believed to be violative of W.S.

40-12-105

from any person who is engaged or is about to engage in such practice. Such assurance is not considered an admission of violation for any purpose. Proof of failure to comply with the assurance of voluntary compliance is prima facie evidence of a violation of this act. Matters closed by virtue of the acceptance of an assurance of voluntary compliance may at any time be reopened by the enforcing authority for further proceedings in the public interest, pursuant to W.S.

40-12-106

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-108.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the next-to-last sentence, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

§ 40-12-108.
Private remedies.

A person relying upon an uncured unlawful deceptive trade practice may bring an action under this act for the damages he has actually suffered as a consumer as a result of such unlawful deceptive trade practice.

Any person who is entitled to bring an action under subsection (a) of this section on his own behalf against an alleged violator of this act for damages for an unlawful deceptive trade practice may bring a class action against such person on behalf of any class of persons of which he is a member and which has been damaged by such unlawful deceptive trade practice, subject to and pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure governing class actions, except as herein expressly provided. If the court determines that actual damages have been suffered by reason of the unlawful deceptive trade practice, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiffs in a class action under this subsection, provided that such fees shall be determined by the amount of time reasonably expended by the attorney for the plaintiffs and not by the amount of the judgment. Any monies or property recovered in a class action under this subsection which cannot, with due diligence, be restored to consumers within one (1) year after judgment becomes final shall be returned to the party depositing the same.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-109.

Cross references. —

As to class actions, see Rule 23, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Notice. —

No notice was provided to the insurance agent of an alleged deceptive trade practice; had the insured read the policy, however, he could have notified the agent prior to the accident that the policy did not provide underinsured motorist coverage, thereby providing the opportunity for negotiations for the addition of such coverage, and the insured had no valid cause of action for an uncured deceptive trade practice under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act.
Broderick v. Dairyland INS. Co., 2012 WY 22, 270 P.3d 684,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 16, 2012).

Video sales

may be covered under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act. However, a plaintiff must suggest in his pleadings that the act is applicable to the case. Osborn v. Emporium Videos, 870 P.2d 382,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Understanding the New Tort of First Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: McCullough v. Golden Rule Insurance Company,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reasonableness of offer of settlement under state deceptive trade practice and consumer protection acts, 90 ALR3d 1350.

Duty of manufacturer to equip product with safety device to protect against patent or obvious danger, 95 ALR3d 1066.

Liability of repairer for unauthorized, unnecessary, or fraudulent repairs of motor vehicle, 23 ALR4th 274.

Award of attorney's fees in actions under state deceptive trade practice and consumer protection acts, 35 ALR4th 12.

Consumers' rights and remedies, under modern state regulation, with respect to formaldehyde foam insulation considered as a health hazard, 38 ALR4th 1064.

Recoverability of compensatory damages for mental anguish or emotional distress for breach of service contract, 54 ALR4th 901.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute or law pertaining to telephone solicitation, 44 ALR5th 619.

Right to private action under state consumer protection act-Equitable relief available, 115 ALR5th 709.

Right to private action under state consumer protection act-Preconditions to action, 117 ALR5th 155.

Civil penalties under § 20 of Consumer Product Safety Act (15 USC § 2069), 70 ALR Fed 617.

§ 40-12-109.
Limitation of actions.

No action may be brought under this act, except under W.S.

40-12-106

, unless the consumer bringing the action gives within the following time limits notice in writing to the alleged violator of the act, (a) within one (1) year after the initial discovery of the unlawful deceptive trade practice, (b) within two (2) years following such consumer transaction, whichever occurs first, and unless the unlawful deceptive trade practice becomes an uncured unlawful deceptive trade practice as defined in this act. The notice required under this section shall state fully the nature of the alleged unlawful deceptive trade practice and the actual damage suffered therefrom. No action may be brought under this act, except under W.S.

40-12-106

, unless said action is initiated within one (1) year after the furnishing of notice as required under this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-110; 2019 ch. 186, Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "W.S.

40-12-106

" for "W.S.

40-12-108

."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout the first and last sentences, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Applicability. —

No notice was provided to the insurance agent of an alleged deceptive trade practice; had the insured read the policy, however, he could have notified the agent prior to the accident that the policy did not provide underinsured motorist coverage, thereby providing the opportunity for negotiations for the addition of such coverage, and the insured had no valid cause of action for an uncured deceptive trade practice under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act.
Broderick v. Dairyland INS. Co., 2012 WY 22, 270 P.3d 684,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 16, 2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What statute of limitations governs action arising out of transaction consummated by use of credit card, 2 ALR4th 677.

When statute of limitations commences to run on action under state deceptive trade practice or consumer protection acts, 18 ALR4th 1340.

§ 40-12-110.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this act shall apply to:

Acts or practices required or permitted by state or federal law, rule or regulation or judicial or administrative decision;

Acts or practices by the publisher, owner, agent or employee of a newspaper, periodical, radio or television station or any other person without knowledge of the deceptive character of the advertisement in the publication or dissemination of an advertisement supplied by another.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-111.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Construction. —

Exemption inapplicable. —

Construction. —

Exemption in subsection (a)(i) does no more than defer to contradictory laws that permit or require a specific act or practice that might otherwise be unlawful under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act; it contains no reference to acts or practices regulated by another entity, and the supreme court may not add language to a statute under the guise of statutory interpretation. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

Exemption inapplicable. —

Record did not establish that a limited liability company operated as a law firm as opposed to a debt resolution entity, but even if it did, the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act did not exempt its operations from coverage under the Act, because it did not provide a blanket exemption from its prohibitions. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

§ 40-12-111.
Violations involving older persons or persons with disabilities; civil penalty.

As used in this section:

“Person with disabilities” means any person who has a mental or educational impairment which substantially limits one (1) or more major life activities;

“Major life activities” means functions associated with the normal activities of independent daily living such as caring for one’s self, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning and working;

“Mental or educational impairment” means:

Any mental or psychological disorder or specific learning disability;

Any educational deficiency which substantially affects a person’s ability to read and comprehend the terms of any contractual agreement entered into.

“Older person” means a person who is over sixty (60) years of age.

Any person who willfully uses, or has willfully used, a method, act or practice in violation of this act which victimizes or attempts to victimize an older person or a person with disabilities, and commits such violation when the person knew or should have known that the conduct was unfair or deceptive, shall make restitution or reimbursement to the older person or person with disabilities including reasonable attorney fees and costs, and, in addition, is liable for a civil penalty of up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) for each violation recoverable by the office of the attorney general.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

40-12-111

, relating to civil penalties, was renumbered by Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 3, as §

40-12-113

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

§ 40-12-112.
Investigative powers of enforcing authority.

If, by inquiry by the enforcing authority or as a result of complaints, the enforcing authority has probable cause to believe that a person has engaged in, or is engaging in, an act or practice that violates this act, investigators designated by the Wyoming attorney general may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses or matter, and collect evidence. Within five (5) days, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after the service of a subpoena or at any time before the return date specified therein, whichever is longer, the party served may file in the district court in the county in which the party resides or in which the party transacts business, or in the district court for the first judicial district of Wyoming, and serve upon the enforcing authority a petition for an order modifying or setting aside the subpoena. The petitioner may raise any objection or privilege which would be available under this act or upon service of a subpoena in a civil action. The subpoena shall inform the party served of the party’s rights under this subsection.

If matter that the enforcing authority seeks to obtain by subpoena is located outside the state, the person subpoenaed may make it available to the enforcing authority to examine the matter at the place where it is located. The enforcing authority may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the matter is located, to inspect the matter on its behalf, and the enforcing authority may respond to similar requests from officials of other states.

Upon failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected, the enforcing authority may apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance.

The enforcing authority may request that an individual who refuses to comply with a subpoena on the ground that testimony or matter may incriminate the individual, be ordered by the court to provide the testimony or matter. Except in a prosecution for perjury, an individual who complies with a court order to provide testimony or matter after asserting a privilege against self-incrimination to which the individual is entitled by law shall not have the testimony or matter so provided, or evidence derived therefrom, received against the individual in any criminal investigation or proceeding.

Any person upon whom a subpoena is served pursuant to this section shall comply with the terms thereof unless otherwise provided by order of the court. Any person who fails to appear with the intent to avoid, evade or prevent compliance in whole or in part with any investigation under this act or who removes from any place, conceals, withholds, mutilates, alters or destroys, or by any other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody or control of any person subject to the subpoena, or knowingly conceals any relevant information with the intent to avoid, evade or prevent compliance is liable for a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

Whenever criminal or civil intelligence, investigative information or any other information held by any state or federal agency is available to the enforcing authority on a confidential or a similarly restricted basis, the enforcing authority, in the course of the investigation of any violation of this act, may obtain and use the information. Any intelligence or investigative information that is confidential or exempt under W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

retains its status as confidential or exempt.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

40-12-112

, relating to the effect of this act on other similar remedies, was renumbered by Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 4, as §

40-12-114

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Subpoena. —

Investigative subpoena is supported by probable cause when the Consumer Protection Unit of the Wyoming Office of Attorney General has sufficient and reasonable information to support a belief that a violation of the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act has occurred or is occurring; the law that applies to administrative agency subpoenas was intended to govern the scope of the Attorney General’s power. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

When the legislature enacted the probable cause requirement the existing law included an agency’s broad investigative authority and a relaxed definition of probable cause to support administrative subpoena; since it is presumed the legislature acts with knowledge of existing law and intends new statutes to be read in harmony with that law, the supreme court cannot infer an intent to incorporate principles of criminal law that had been rejected in the context of administrative investigations. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

By its plain terms, the statute does not restrict the Consumer Protection Unit of the Wyoming Office of Attorney General from investigating complaints that originate outside Wyoming or from using those complaints as probable cause to support an investigative subpoena; the supreme court presumes that the legislature enacted the statute with an understanding that an administrative agency’s authority to request records and undertake other investigatory functions is extremely broad. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

Probable cause supported an investigative subpoena because the Consumer Protection Unit of the Wyoming Office of Attorney General had probable cause to believe that a limited liability company (LLC) had engaged in or was engaging in unfair or deceptive acts or practices; the Attorney General relied on several complaints to support its reasonable belief that the LLC lured consumers into a relationship with the promise of services that were not delivered. WyoLaw, LLC v. State, 2021 WY 61, 486 P.3d 964,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2021).

§ 40-12-113.
Civil penalties.

The enforcing authority, upon petition to the court, may recover, on behalf of the state, a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) from any person who violates the terms of a permanent injunction issued under W.S.

40-12-106

.

For purposes of this section, the court issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued.

Except as provided in W.S.

40-12-111

, any person or agent or employee of the person, who willfully uses, or has willfully used, a method or act, in violation of this act, is liable for a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. Willful violations occur when the person knew or should have known that the person’s conduct was unfair or deceptive. This civil penalty may be recovered in any action brought under this act by the enforcing authority or the enforcing authority may terminate any investigation or action upon agreement by the person to pay a stipulated civil penalty. The enforcing authority or the court may waive any civil penalty if the person has previously made full restitution or reimbursement or has paid actual damages to the consumers who have been injured by the unlawful act or practice. If civil penalties are assessed in any litigation, the enforcing authority is entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-112; W.S. 1977, §

40-12-111

; Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil penalties under § 20 of Consumer Product Safety Act (15 USC § 2069), 70 ALR Fed 617.

§ 40-12-114.
Effect on other remedies.

This act shall not prohibit actions under other statutory or common-law provisions against conduct or practices similar to those declared to be unlawful by W.S.

40-12-105

. However, the remedies provided in this act are the exclusive remedies for actions brought pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-113; W.S. 1977, §

40-12-112

; Laws 2000, ch. 84, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to once in the first sentence and twice in the second sentence, see § 40-12-102(a)(x).

Severability. —

Laws 1973, ch. 178, § 1, provides: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”